Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1810.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER; OUT-OF-STATE BILLING.new text end new text begin By December 1, 2025, the commissioner of human services shall submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services proposed amendments to home and community-based services waiver plans to include individualized home supports without training, respite, and night supervision in the definition of "direct care staff services" that may be authorized and provided to a waiver participant who is either traveling temporarily out of state or attending an out-of-state postsecondary school. new text end